Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,131
Detention and staff secure juvenile facility;
inspection; report.

Personnel of the Nebraska
Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice shall visit and inspect
each criminal detention facility, juvenile detention facility, and staff secure juvenile facility in
the state, except correctional facilities accredited by a nationally recognized
correctional association pursuant to subsection (2) of section 83-4,126, for
the purpose of determining the conditions of confinement, the treatment of
persons confined in the facilities, and whether such facilities comply with
the minimum standards established by the Jail Standards Board. A written report
of each inspection shall be made within thirty days following such inspection
to the appropriate governing body responsible for the criminal detention facility, juvenile detention facility, or staff secure juvenile facility involved.
The report shall specify those areas in which the facility does not comply
with the required minimum standards.

Laws 1975, LB 417, § 30;

Laws 1978, LB 212, § 8;

R.S.Supp.,1980, § 83-950;

Laws 1981, LB 328, § 10;

Laws 1992, LB 1184, § 20;

Laws 1996, LB 233, § 18;

Laws 2011, LB390, § 28;

Laws 2013, LB561, § 67.